Massachusetts, session 194th, H3048.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out, in lines 64-68, subparagraph (6) of paragraph (a) of subsection
B and inserting in place thereof the following subparagraph:-
(6) Interests and dividends in the amount of five hundred dollars for a single person, head
of household or a married person filing a separate return or one thousand dollars for a husband
and wife filing a joint return from savings deposits, savings accounts, shares or share savings
accounts included in Part B gross income.
of 1